Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "minor" means a person under twenty-one (21) years of
age.
(2) Any person who sustains injury or property damage, or the estate of any person
killed, as a proximate result of the negligence of an intoxicated minor shall have,
in addition to any other cause of action available in tort, a cause of action
against:
(a) Any person who knew or should have known through the use of ordinary
care that a minor consumed alcohol or another intoxicating or controlled
substance not medically prescribed to the minor in the person's home or on
property under the person's control; and
(b) Any person, other than the minor's parent, who furnished, delivered, or
procured for the minor the alcohol or other intoxicating or controlled
substance not medically prescribed to the minor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:33 PM Jacketed